Florida, session 2026, HB181.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
19
20 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
21 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
22 119.071 General exemptions from inspection or copying of
23 public records.—
24 (4) AGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.—
25 (d)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
Page 1 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
26 a. "Home addresses" means the dwelling location at which
27 an individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing
28 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot
29 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood
30 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive
31 property information that may reveal the home address.
32 b. "Judicial assistant" means a court employee assigned to
33 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320.
34 c. "Legal assistant" means any employee of the office of
35 the public defender or the office of criminal conflict and civil
36 regional counsel other than a public defender, an assistant
37 public defender, a criminal conflict and civil regional counsel,
38 or an assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel.
39 d.c. "Telephone numbers" includes home telephone numbers,
40 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone
41 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal
42 communications devices.
43 2.a. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
44 birth, and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement
45 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by
46 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and
47 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of
48 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of
49 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal
50 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties
Page 2 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
51 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and
52 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments
53 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and
54 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home
55 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
56 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
57 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
58 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
59 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
60 Constitution.
61 b. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
62 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
63 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties
64 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workers' compensation
65 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal
66 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the
67 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
68 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
69 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
70 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
71 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
72 Constitution.
73 c. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
74 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
75 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulation's Bureau of
Page 3 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
76 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation
77 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state
78 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses,
79 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
80 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
81 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
82 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
83 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
84 d. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
85 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in
86 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone
87 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment
88 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names
89 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
90 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
91 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
92 e. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
93 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court,
94 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and
95 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names,
96 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
97 employment of the spouses and children of current or former
98 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the
99 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
100 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of
Page 4 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
101 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
102 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph
103 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in
104 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2,
105 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment
106 by the Legislature.
107 f. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
108 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant
109 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide
110 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
111 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
112 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys,
113 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant
114 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools
115 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or
116 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide
117 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from
118 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
119 g. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
120 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
121 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
122 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
123 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
124 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and
125 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
Page 5 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
126 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
127 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
128 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day
129 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates,
130 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims,
131 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative
132 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are
133 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
134 Constitution.
135 h. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
136 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor
137 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors,
138 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency
139 or water management district whose duties include hiring and
140 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or
141 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses,
142 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
143 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
144 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
145 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
146 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
147 i. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
148 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers;
149 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
150 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such
Page 6 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
151 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
152 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
153 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
154 Constitution.
155 j. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
156 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
157 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home
158 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
159 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the
160 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
161 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
162 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
163 k. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
164 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation
165 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention
166 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile
167 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention
168 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers,
169 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II,
170 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor
171 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior
172 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation
173 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of
174 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
175 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children
Page 7 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
176 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and
177 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel
178 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
179 Constitution.
180 l. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
181 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant
182 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel,
183 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel and
184 current legal assistants; the names, home addresses, telephone
185 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses
186 and children of current or former public defenders, assistant
187 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel,
188 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel and
189 current legal assistants; and the names and locations of schools
190 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or
191 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal
192 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal
193 conflict and civil regional counsel and current legal assistants
194 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
195 Constitution.
196 m. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
197 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors
198 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the
199 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
200 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current
Page 8 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
201 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and
202 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
203 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors
204 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
205 Constitution.
206 n. The home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of
207 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses,
208 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
209 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names
210 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
211 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
212 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
213 o. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
214 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department
215 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination
216 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability
217 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed
218 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health
219 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the
220 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone
221 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses
222 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of
223 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such
224 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
225 the State Constitution.
Page 9 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
226 p. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
227 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner
228 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former
229 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties
230 result in a determination of a person's skill and safety to
231 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses,
232 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
233 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees;
234 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities
235 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are
236 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
237 Constitution.
238 q. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
239 and photographs of current or former emergency medical
240 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the
241 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
242 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
243 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and
244 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
245 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are
246 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
247 Constitution.
248 r. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
249 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an
250 agency's office of inspector general or internal audit
Page 10 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
251 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste,
252 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that
253 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline;
254 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
255 and places of employment of spouses and children of such
256 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
257 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
258 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
259 Constitution.
260 s. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
261 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
262 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction
263 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers,
264 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
265 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
266 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
267 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
268 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this
269 sub-subparagraph, the term "addiction treatment facility" means
270 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed
271 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention,
272 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed
273 service component described in s. 397.311(27).
274 t. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
275 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
Page 11 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
276 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center
277 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the
278 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a
279 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties
280 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual
281 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation
282 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case
283 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
284 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
285 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the
286 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
287 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s.
288 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
289 u. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
290 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
291 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s.
292 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the
293 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names,
294 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates
295 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such
296 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
297 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
298 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
299 Constitution.
300 v. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
Page 12 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
301 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators
302 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the
303 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
304 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or
305 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations
306 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of
307 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s.
308 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This
309 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review
310 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on
311 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
312 reenactment by the Legislature.
313 w. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
314 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county
315 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant
316 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home
317 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
318 places of employment of the spouses and children of current
319 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county
320 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy
321 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day
322 care facilities attended by the children of current county
323 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys,
324 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city
325 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
Page 13 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
326 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a
327 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county
328 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city
329 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public
330 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government
331 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
332 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from
333 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
334 x. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
335 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the
336 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses,
337 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of
338 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former
339 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day
340 care facilities attended by the children of such current or
341 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
342 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is
343 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance
344 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029,
345 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
346 Legislature.
347 y. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
348 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
349 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
350 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates
Page 14 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
351 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children
352 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the
353 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the
354 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
355 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
356 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
357 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
358 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the
359 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15
360 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and
361 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
362 z.(I) As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term:
363 (A) "Congressional member" means a person who is elected
364 to serve as a member of the United States House of
365 Representatives or is elected or appointed to serve as a member
366 of the United States Senate.
367 (B) "Partial home address" means the dwelling location at
368 which an individual resides and includes the physical address,
369 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number,
370 plot identification number, legal property description,
371 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other
372 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial
373 home address, except for the city and zip code.
374 (C) "Public officer" means a person who holds one of the
375 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief
Page 15 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
376 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner,
377 state representative, state senator, property appraiser,
378 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board
379 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner.
380 (II) The following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1)
381 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
382 (A) The partial home addresses of a current congressional
383 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
384 (B) The telephone numbers of a current congressional
385 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
386 (C) The name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date
387 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or
388 public officer and the name and location of the school or day
389 care facility attended by the minor child.
390 (III) This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open
391 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
392 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and
393 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
394 3.a. An agency that is the custodian of the information
395 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the
396 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in
397 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that
398 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other
399 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a
400 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption
Page 16 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
401 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the
402 statutory basis for the individual's exemption request and
403 confirm the individual's status as a party eligible for exempt
404 status.
405 b. An agency that is the custodian of information
406 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer
407 of the congressional member, public officer, or other person
408 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt
409 status of that information only if an individual requests the
410 maintenance of an exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on
411 the basis of eligibility as a current congressional member or
412 public officer and his or her spouse or child submits, as part
413 of the written and notarized request required by sub-
414 subparagraph a., the date of the congressional member's or
415 public officer's election or appointment to public office, the
416 date on which that office is next subject to election, and, if
417 applicable, the date on which the current congressional member's
418 or public officer's minor child reaches the age of majority. The
419 custodian must maintain an exemption granted pursuant to sub-
420 subparagraph 2.z. until the qualifying conditions for the
421 exemption no longer apply to the person subject to the
422 exemption.
423 4.a. A county property appraiser, as defined in s.
424 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s.
425 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for
Page 17 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
426 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must
427 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status
428 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page
429 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all
430 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser
431 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before
432 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax
433 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1,
434 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may
435 not remove the street address, legal description, or other
436 information identifying real property within the agency's
437 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise
438 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is
439 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the
440 public records of the agency.
441 b. Any information restricted from public display,
442 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be
443 provided to the individual whose information was removed.
444 5. An officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other
445 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request
446 for the release of his or her exempt information to the
447 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must
448 specify the information to be released and the party authorized
449 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request,
450 the custodial agency must release the specified information to
Page 18 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
451 the party authorized to receive such information.
452 6. The exemptions in this paragraph apply to information
453 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the
454 exemption.
455 7. Information made exempt under this paragraph may be
456 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized
457 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s.
458 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as
459 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney
460 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing
461 with The Florida Bar.
462 8. The exempt status of a home address contained in the
463 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a
464 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon
465 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such
466 real property no longer constitutes a protected party's home
467 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party
468 must submit a written request to release the removed information
469 to the county recorder. The written request to release the
470 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a
471 protected party's request for release is pursuant to a
472 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the
473 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerk's
474 file number for each document containing the information to be
475 released.
Page 19 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
476 9. Upon the death of a protected party as verified by a
477 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party
478 can request the county recorder to release a protected
479 decedent's removed information unless there is a related request
480 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the
481 decedent's information or unless such removal is otherwise
482 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to
483 release the removed information upon the death of a protected
484 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or
485 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for
486 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must
487 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument
488 number, or clerk's file number for each document containing the
489 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the
490 release of any document pursuant to such request.
491 Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
492 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
493 birth, and places of employment of current legal assistants
494 employed by the office of the public defender and the office of
495 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the names, home
496 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
497 employment of the spouses and children of current legal
498 assistants employed by the office of the public defender and the
499 office of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; and the
500 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
Page 20 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
501 by the children of current legal assistants employed by the
502 office of the public defender and the office of criminal
503 conflict and civil regional counsel be made exempt from s.
504 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the
505 State Constitution. While performing their duties of scheduling
506 meetings with criminal defendants, answering telephone calls,
507 responding to correspondence, and interacting in person with
508 criminal defendants, legal assistants and their families may
509 incur the ill will of defendants and their associates and
510 families. As a result, legal assistants and their families may
511 be targets for acts of revenge. If such identifying and location
512 information is released, the safety of legal assistants and
513 their families could be seriously jeopardized. For this reason,
514 the Legislature finds that it is a public necessity that such
515 identifying and location information be made exempt from public
516 records requirements. The Legislature further finds that the
517 harm that may result from the release of such identifying and
518 location information outweighs any public benefit that may be
519 derived from the disclosure of the information.
520 Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
521 744.21031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
522 744.21031 Public records exemption.—
523 (1) For purposes of this section, the term:
524 (c) "Telephone numbers" has the same meaning as provided
525 in s. 119.071(4)(d)1.d. s. 119.071(4)(d)1.c.
Page 21 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 181 2026
526 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 22 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb181-00